src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-xusuwey_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Quantifier - хусувэй: # Quantifier 'every' - partial paradigm /Type 10/
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: хусувэй
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc: хусувэймʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen: хусувэйʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat: хусувэнʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Loc: хусувэхэна
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl: хусувэхэд
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Pros: хусувэювна
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Nom: хусувэхэʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Acc: хусувэхэʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Gen: хусувэхэʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: хусувэйˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc: хусувэй
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen: хусувэйˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat: хусувэхэˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Loc: хусувэхэˮна
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl: хусувэхэт
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Pros: хусувэˮмна

     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra: хусувэӈэ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra: хусувэсиˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra: хусувэдремʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra: хусувэдревʼ

# Possessive forms 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: хусувэв 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: хусувэр  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: хусувэда 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: хусувэмиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: хусувэриʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: хусувэдиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: хусувэваˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: хусувэраˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: хусувэдоʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: хусувэв   
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: хусувэми  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: хусувэмд  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: хусувэмда 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: хусувэмиʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: хусувэмдиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: хусувэмдиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: хусувэваˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: хусувэмдаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: хусувэмдоʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: хусувэн   
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: хусувэни  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: хусувэнд  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: хусувэнда 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: хусувэниʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: хусувэндиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: хусувэндиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: хусувэнаˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: хусувэндаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: хусувэндоʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: хусувэхэн   
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: хусувэхэни  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: хусувэхэнд  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: хусувэхэнда 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: хусувэхэниʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: хусувэхэндиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: хусувэхэндиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: хусувэхэнаˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: хусувэхэндаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: хусувэхэндоʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: хусувэхэнан   
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: хусувэхэнани  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: хусувэхэнанд  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: хусувэхэнанда 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: хусувэхэнаниʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: хусувэхэнандиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: хусувэхэнандиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: хусувэхэнанаˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: хусувэхэнандаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: хусувэхэнандоʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: хусувэхэдан   
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: хусувэхэдани  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: хусувэхэданд  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: хусувэхэданда 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: хусувэхэданиʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: хусувэхэдандиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: хусувэхэдандиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: хусувэхэданаˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: хусувэхэдандаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: хусувэхэдандоʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: хусувэвнан   
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: хусувэвнани  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: хусувэвнанд  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: хусувэвнанда 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: хусувэвнаниʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: хусувэвнандиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: хусувэвнандиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: хусувэвнанаˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: хусувэвнандаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: хусувэвнандоʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: хусувэхэюн  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: хусувэхэюд  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: хусувэхэюда 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: хусувэхэюниʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: хусувэхэюдиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: хусувэхэюдиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: хусувэхэюнаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: хусувэхэюдаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: хусувэхэюдоʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: хусувэхэюн  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: хусувэхэюд  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: хусувэхэюда 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: хусувэхэюниʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: хусувэхэюдиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: хусувэхэюдиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: хусувэхэюнаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: хусувэхэюдаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: хусувэхэюдоʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: хусувэхэюн  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: хусувэхэют  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: хусувэхэюта 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: хусувэхэюниʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: хусувэхэютиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: хусувэхэютиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: хусувэхэюнаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: хусувэхэютаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: хусувэхэютоʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: хусувэн   
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: хусувэд   
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: хусувэда  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: хусувэниʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: хусувэдиʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: хусувэдиʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: хусувэнаˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: хусувэдаˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: хусувэдоʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: хусувэн   
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: хусувэд   
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: хусувэда  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: хусувэниʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: хусувэдиʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: хусувэдиʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: хусувэнаˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: хусувэдаˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: хусувэдоʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: хусувэˮн  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: хусувэˮни 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: хусувэт   
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: хусувэта  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: хусувэˮниʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: хусувэтиʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: хусувэтиʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: хусувэˮнаˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: хусувэтаˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: хусувэтоʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: хусувэхэˮн 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: хусувэхэт 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: хусувэхэта 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: хусувэхэˮниʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: хусувэхэтиʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: хусувэхэтиʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: хусувэхэˮнаˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: хусувэхэтаˮ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: хусувэхэтоʼ 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: хусувэхэˮнан  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: хусувэхэˮнат  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: хусувэхэˮната 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: хусувэхэˮнаниʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: хусувэхэˮнатиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: хусувэхэˮнатиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: хусувэхэˮнанаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: хусувэхэˮнатаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: хусувэхэˮнатоʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: хусувэхэтан 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: хусувэхэтат 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: хусувэхэтата 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: хусувэхэтаниʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: хусувэхэтатиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: хусувэхэтатиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: хусувэхэтанаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: хусувэхэтатаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: хусувэхэтатоʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: хусувэˮманан  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: хусувэˮманат  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: хусувэˮманата 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: хусувэˮмананиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: хусувэˮманатиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: хусувэˮманатиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: хусувэˮмананаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: хусувэˮманатаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: хусувэˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative !Should be added

     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Pred+Abs: хусувэд
     
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: хусувэдмʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хусувэн  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хусувэй   
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: хусувэниʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: хусувэдиʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хусувэхаʼ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: хусувэваˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хусувэдаˮ
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хусувэйˮ  
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: хусувэдамзь
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: хусувэнась 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хусувэсь   
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: хусувэнинзь
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: хусувэдинзь
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хусувэханзь
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: хусувэваць 
     хусувэй+Qnt+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: хусувэдаць 
